Hawaii, session 2026, SB2919.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $125,004 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) deputy public defender III position within the office of the public defender (BUF151); provided that the deputy public defender III shall be assigned as needed to provide counsel on constitutional and related legal matters. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the office of the public defender for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________